Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5306XS (4) 91 th/ns S.F. 2234 Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 16A. U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue special registration plates displaying a 5 U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) processed emblem to the owner of a motor 6 vehicle referred to in subsection 12. 7 b. The department shall design the processed emblem to 8 depict the official crest of the U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) in 9 consultation with the U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) commissioning 10 committee. 11 c. The special U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) fee for letter-number 12 designated U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) plates is thirty-five dollars. 13 An applicant may obtain personalized U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) 14 plates upon payment of the fee for personalized plates as 15 provided in subsection 5, which is in addition to the special 16 U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) fee. Personalized plates authorized by 17 this subsection shall be limited to no more than five numerals, 18 letters, or combinations of numerals and letters. 19 d. The fees collected by the director under this subsection 20 shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and deposited 21 in the road use tax fund. The treasurer of state shall 22 transfer monthly from the statutory allocations fund created 23 under section 321.145, subsection 2, to the general fund of 24 the state the amount of the special fees collected in the 25 previous month for U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) plates. Such moneys 26 are appropriated to the department of veterans affairs to 27 distribute in the form of grants to organizations that provide 28 suicide prevention support to veterans. Notwithstanding 29 section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this paragraph shall 30 not revert. 31 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 32 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 33 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 34 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 35 -1- LSB 5306XS (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 2234 registration plates are validated under this section. The 1 annual special U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) fee for letter-number 2 designated plates is ten dollars which shall be paid in 3 addition to the regular annual registration fee. The annual 4 fee for personalized U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) plates is five 5 dollars which shall be paid in addition to the annual special 6 U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) fee and the regular annual registration 7 fee. The annual special U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) fee shall be 8 credited as provided under paragraph âdâ . 9 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of U.S.S. 10 Iowa (SSN-797) plates on the receipt of any number of orders 11 for U.S.S. Iowa (SSN-797) plates. 12